apertium-tur-kir.tur.lexc
LEXICON N1

%<n%>: # ; 
%<n%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: # ; 
%<adj%>:%>l%{I%}%{k%} # ; 
%<np%>%<top%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<loc%>:%'%>%{D%}%{A%}%{k%}i DAKI ; ! This makes an attributive phrase from a noun, TRmorph <loc><ki>

LEXICON NP-ACR

%<np%>%<acr%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<acr%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 


LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<al%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON A2

%<adj%>: # ; 

LEXICON A1

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON A3

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<n%>: # ; 
%<n%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ;  ! Dir/LR
%<n%>: NINFL-COMMON  ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r NINFL-COMMON  ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%' NINFL-COMMON  ;  ! Dir/LR

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: # ; 
%<adv%>%<attr%>: # ;  ! <adv> as <adj> function

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%<num%>: # ;


LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: NINFL-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{bI%}nc%{I%} # ; ! This is <D_IncI> in TRmorph
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{bI%}nc%{I%} NINFL-COMMON ; ! This is <D_IncI> in TRmorph

LEXICON V-PERS-G1

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>n # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{k%} # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;


LEXICON V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3-FINAL

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}m # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}z  # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  # ;


LEXICON V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}m clit ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  clit ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  clit ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}z  clit ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  clit ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  clit ;


LEXICON V-PERS-COP-G2

%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  clit ;
V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3 ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-OPT-G3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>y%{I%}m # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>l%{I%}m # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;

LEXICON V-PERS-IMP-G4

%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{A%}n%{A%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}n #;
!%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}n%{I%}z #;
!%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{A%}n%{I%}z%{A%} # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}n #;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}n%{I%}z #;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{A%}n%{I%}z%{A%} # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}nl%{A%}r # ;

LEXICON VINFL-COMMON

%<ger1%>:%>m%{A%} # ;
%<ger1%>:%>m%{A%} NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger2%>:%>m%{A%}%{K%} # ;
%<ger2%>:%>m%{A%}%{K%} NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger3%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}%{k%} # ;
%<ger3%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}%{k%} NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger4%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}ş # ;
%<ger4%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}ş NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger5%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}n # ;
%<ger5%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}n NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger8%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}c%{A%}%{k%} # ;
%<ger8%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}c%{A%}%{k%} NINFL-COMMON ;
%<impp%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}r%{A%}%{k%} # ;
%<impp%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}r%{A%}%{k%} NINFL-COMMON ;

%<prc1%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}p # ;
%<prc1%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}p clit-cop ;

%<gna1%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}p # ;
%<gna1%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}p clit-cop ;

%<gna9%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%} # ;
%<gna9%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%} clit-cop ;

%<cont%>:%>%{bI%}yor V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<cont%>:%>%{bI%}yor clit-cop ; ! This should be renamed e.g. <cont><past> 
%<opt%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%} V-PERS-OPT-G3 ;
%<past%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<evid%>:%>m%{I%}ş V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<imp%>: V-PERS-IMP-G4 ;
%<fut%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}c%{A%}%{k%} V-PERS-COP-G2 ; 
%<cond%>:%>s%{A%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<pii%>:%>m%{A%}kt%{A%} V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<oblig%>:%>m%{A%}l%{I%} V-PERS-COP-G2 ;

!! Enumerate the possibilities for verb combinations in Turkish (go go turmorph!)
!! Unmarked entries get -t for causative if they end in l, r, or a vowel, otherwise -DIr. 
!
!LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_AR
!%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>t  VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
!
!LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_IR
!%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}r VINFL-COMMON ;


!LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_ART-AOR_AR
!%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}rt VINFL-COMMON ;
!

LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR

%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<aor%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ; ! add to all!
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;

!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<aor%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR
! art<iv><caus_ir><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_IR
! IRREG does not get causative (it's in the lexicon ?)
! gel<iv><caus_irreg>
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR
! IRREG does not get causative (it's in the lexicon ?)
! ay<iv><caus_irreg><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;

LEXICON Nouns
gezi:gezi N1 ; ! "trip"
sanayi:sanayi N1 ; ! "industry"
aşçı:aşçı N1 ; ! ""
darbe:darbe N1 ; ! ""
takdir:takdir N1 ; ! ""
uzaklık:uzaklı%{k%} N1 ; ! ""
düello:düello N1 ; ! ""
ev:ev N1 ; ! ""
galeri:galeri N1 ; ! ""
ideolog:ideolo%{g%} N1 ; ! ""
karış:karış N1 ; ! ""
sadaka:sadaka N1 ; ! ""
tablet:tablet N1 ; ! ""
nakit:nak%{del%}i%{t%} N1 ; ! ""
politeizm:politeizm N1 ; ! ""
LEXICON ProperNouns
Antartika:Antartika NP-TOP ; ! ""
Bangladeş:Bangladeş NP-TOP ; ! ""
Bişkek:Bişkek NP-TOP ; ! ""
Dubai:Dubai NP-TOP ; ! ""
Fatiha:Fatiha NP-TOP ; ! ""
Hamburg:Hamburg NP-TOP ; ! ""
Irak:Irak NP-TOP ; ! ""
İsrail:İsrail NP-TOP ; ! ""
Kazakistan:Kazakistan NP-TOP ; ! ""
Küba:Küba NP-TOP ; ! ""
Lüksemburg:Lüksemburg NP-TOP ; ! ""
Mezopotamya:Mezopotamya NP-TOP ; ! ""
Üsküp:Üsküp NP-TOP ; ! "Skopje"
Moskova:Moskova NP-TOP ; ! ""
Ana:Ana NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Ahmet:Ahmet NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Ana:Ana NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Anna:Anna NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Anja:Anja NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Sandra:Sandra NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Ana:Ana NP-ANT-F ; ! "Ana"
Belkiç:Belkiç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Ceriç:Ceriç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Daviniç:Daviniç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Graniç:Graniç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Jelaviç:Jelaviç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Karadziç:Karadziç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Krstajiç:Krstajiç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Margetiç:Margetiç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Miçiç:Miçiç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Milutinoviç:Milutinoviç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Pavloviç:Pavloviç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Radiç:Radiç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Stamboliç:Stamboliç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Vujanoviç:Vujanoviç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
LEXICON Acronyms
AP:AP%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "AP'nin"
BM:BM%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! BM'nin
CNA:CNA%{nın%} NP-ACR ; ! "CNA'nın"
DPMNE:DPMNE%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "DPMNE'nin"
EBRD:EBRD%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "EBRD'nin"
FT:FT%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "FT'nin"
HINA:HINA%{nın%} NP-ACR ; ! "HINA'nın"
KFOR:KFOR%{un%} NP-ACR ; ! "KFOR'un"
NTV:NTV%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "NTV'nin"
PIC:PIC%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "PIC'nin"
RTS:RTS%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "RTS'nin"
SDS:SDS%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "SDS'nin"
SRNA:SRNA%{nın%} NP-ACR ; ! "SRNA'nın"
TV:TV%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "TV'nin"
LEXICON Adjectives 
var:var A2 ; ! ""
yok:yok A2 ; ! ""
korkak:korka%{k%} A1 ; ! ""
tropik:tropi%{k%} A1 ; ! ""
çarpık:çarpı%{k%} A1 ; ! ""
erkek:erke%{k%} A1 ; ! ""
halis:halis A1 ; ! ""
izole:izole A1 ; ! ""
mecbur:mecbur A1 ; ! ""
nazik:nazi%{k%} A1 ; ! ""
sahte:sahte A1 ; ! ""
taşkın:taşkın A1 ; ! ""
informatik:informatik A1 ; ! ""
kurak:kurak A1 ; ! "arid"
yanlı:yanlı A1 ; ! "nonobjective"
LEXICON Adverbs 
fazla:fazla ADV ; ! "too"
eğreti:eğreti ADV ; ! ""
ancak:anca%{k%} ADV ; ! ""
aylarca:aylarca ADV ; ! ""
bir:bir ADV ; ! ""
çabucak:çabuca%{k%} ADV ; ! ""
dostane:dostane ADV ; ! ""
evvel:evvel ADV ; ! ""
gücün:gücün ADV ; ! ""
istinaden:istinaden ADV ; ! ""
mutlaka:mutlaka ADV ; ! ""
resmen:resmen ADV ; ! ""
tersine:tersine ADV ; ! ""
LEXICON Verbs
gel:gel VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_IR ; ! "come"
git:gi%{t%} VIVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_AR ; ! "go"
git:gi%{t%} VIVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_AR ; ! "go"
ay:ay VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR ; ! ""
art:art VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
bat:bat VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
buy:buy VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR ; ! ""
doğ:doğ VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
sol:sol VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
taş:taş VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
uç:uç VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
yit:yit VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
şiş:şiş VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
değiş:değiş VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
kesiş:kesiş VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "intersect"
kop:kop VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "shear off"
küs:küs VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "become stunted"
oluş:oluş VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "come into existence"
on:on VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "be happy"
pus:pus VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "shrink"
sek:sek VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "rebound"
silkin:silkin VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "shake oneself"
şükret:şükret VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "render thanks"
tüken:tüken VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "be exhausted"
vazgeç:vazgeç VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "give up"
yakış:yakış VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "become, befit"
yoksun:yoksun VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "lack"
art:art VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "increase"
aşın:aşın VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "rub off"
böbürlen:böbürlen VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "brag"
çap:çap VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "rush"
çoğal:çoğal VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "increase, propagate"
don:don VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "freeze"
eğil:eğil VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "incline"
er:er VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "attain"
gözük:gözük VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "to be seem"
kaç:kaç VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "escape"
kaygılan:kaygılan VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "worry about"
